Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.039

Greyhound racing prohibited.

(1) A person may not hold, conduct, or operate live greyhound racing for public exhibition, parimutuel betting, or special exhibition events, if such activities are conducted for gambling purposes. A person may not transmit or receive intrastate or interstate simulcasting of greyhound racing for commercial, parimutuel, or exhibition purposes, if such activities are conducted for gambling purposes.

(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B felony, under RCW 9.46.220, professional gambling in the first degree, and is subject to the penalty under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1996 c 252 s 1.]